North Carolina, session 2025, HB1125.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated as a grant to Wakaboomee, a nonprofit
corporation, to expand the Wakaboomee's statewide reach into Johnston and Wayne Counties,
bringing programming to rural and underserved communities, delivering science, technology,
engineering, arts, and mathematics to community members.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1125-v-1*